Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-121
License; delivery; method.

When delivering any type of license under the Nebraska Liquor Control Act to a licensee, the commission may use mail or electronic delivery.

Laws 2022, LB1204, § 2.